cs: Bezpečnostní dokumentace k dispozici: Prohlášení o alergenech; Certifikát analýzy (CoA); Certifikát/prohlášení IFRA; Žádné; Bezpečnostní list (SDS/MSDS); Technický list (TDS); Jiné
it: Documentazione di sicurezza disponibile: Dichiarazione/certificato allergeni; Certificato di analisi (CoA); Certificato/Dichiarazione IFRA; Nessuna; Scheda di dati di sicurezza (SDS/MSDS); Scheda tecnica (TDS); Altro
ja: 安全に関する資料が入手可能です: アレルゲンに関する声明 / 申告書; 分析証明書 (CoA); IFRA 証明書 / 声明; なし; 安全データシート (SDS/MSDS); 技術データシート (TDS); その他
el: Διατίθεται τεκμηρίωση ασφάλειας: Δήλωση αλλεργιογόνων; Πιστοποιητικό ανάλυσης (CoA); Πιστοποιητικό/Δήλωση IFRA; Κανένα; Δελτίο δεδομένων ασφαλείας (SDS/MSDS); Φύλλο τεχνικών δεδομένων (TDS); Άλλο
pt-BR: Documentação de segurança disponível: Declaração de alérgenos; Certificado de análise (CoA); Certificado/declaração da IFRA; Nenhum; Ficha de dados de segurança (SDS/MSDS); Ficha técnica (TDS); Outros
da: Tilgængelig sikkerhedsdokumentation: Allergenerklæring/-deklaration; Analysecertifikat (CoA); IFRA-certifikat/-erklæring; Ingen; Sikkerhedsdatablad (SDS/MSDS); Teknisk datablad (TDS); Andet
fi: Turvallisuusasiakirjat saatavilla: Allergeenilausunto/-ilmoitus; Analyysitodistus (CoA); IFRA-todistus/-lausunto; Ei mitään; Käyttöturvallisuustiedote (SDS/MSDS); Tekninen tuoteseloste (TDS); Muu
es: Documentación de seguridad disponible: Declaración/certificado de alérgenos; Certificado de análisis (COA); Certificado/declaración de IFRA; Ninguna; Ficha de datos de seguridad (FDS/MSDS); Ficha técnica (TDS); Otra
de: Verfügbare Sicherheitsdokumentation: Allergen-Erklärung/-Deklaration; Analysenzertifikat (CoA); IFRA-Zertifikat/-Erklärung; Keine; Sicherheitsdatenblatt (SDB/MSDS); Technisches Datenblatt (TDS); Sonstige
tr: Dail olan güvenlik dokümanları: Alerjen beyanı/bildirimi; Analiz sertifikası (CoA); IFRA sertifikası/beyanı; Yok; Güvenlik bilgi formu (SDS/MSDS); Teknik bilgi formu (TDS); Diğer
ru: Доступная документация по безопасности: Заявление/декларация об аллергенах; Сертификат анализа (CoA); Сертификат/заявление IFRA; Нет; Паспорт безопасности (SDS/MSDS); Технический паспорт (TDS); Другое
pl: Dostępna dokumentacja bezpieczeństwa: Oświadczenie/deklaracja dotycząca alergenów; Certyfikat analizy (CoA); Certyfikat/oświadczenie IFRA; Brak; Karta charakterystyki (SDS/MSDS); Karta techniczna (TDS); Inne
pt-PT: Documentação de segurança disponível: Declaração/certificado de alergénios; Certificado de análise (CoA); Certificado/declaração IFRA; Nenhum; Ficha de dados de segurança (FDS/MSDS); Ficha técnica (TDS); Outro
sl-SI: Na voljo je varnostna dokumentacija: Izjava/deklaracija o alergenih; Analizni certifikat (CoA); Certifikat/izjava IFRA; Brez; Varnostni list (SDS/MSDS); Tehnični list (TDS); Drugo
vi: Tài liệu an toàn có sẵn: Tuyên bố/cam kết về chất gây dị ứng; Giấy chứng nhận phân tích (CoA); Chứng nhận/tuyên bố IFRA; Không có; Bảng chỉ dẫn an toàn hóa chất (SDS/MSDS); Bảng dữ liệu kỹ thuật (TDS); Khác
lt-LT: Galima saugos dokumentacija: Alergenų pažyma / deklaracija; Analizės sertifikatas (CoA); IFRA sertifikatas / pažyma; Nėra; Saugos duomenų lapas (SDL / MSDL); Techninių duomenų lapas (TDL); Kita
nb: Sikkerhetsdokumentasjon tilgjengelig: Allergenerklæring; Analysesertifikat (CoA); IFRA-sertifikat/-erklæring; Ingen; Sikkerhetsdatablad (SDS/MSDS); Teknisk datablad (TDS); Annet
nl: Veiligheidsdocumentatie beschikbaar: Allergenenverklaring; Analysecertificaat (CoA); IFRA-certificaat/-verklaring; Geen; Veiligheidsinformatieblad (SDS/MSDS); Technische specificaties (TDS); Overige
en: Safety documentation available: Allergen statement/declaration; Certificate of analysis (CoA); IFRA certificate/statement; None; Safety data sheet (SDS/MSDS); Technical data sheet (TDS); Other
bg-BG: Налична документация за безопасност: Декларация за алергени; Сертификат за анализ (CoA); IFRA сертификат/декларация; Няма; Информационен лист за безопасност (SDS/MSDS); Технически лист с данни (TDS); Друго
hr-HR: Dostupna sigurnosna dokumentacija: Izjava/deklaracija o alergenima; Certifikat analize (CoA); IFRA certifikat/izjava; Nema; Sigurnosno-tehnički list (SDS/MSDS); Tehnički list (TDS); Ostalo
zh-TW: 提供的安全文件: 過敏原聲明 / 宣告; 檢驗分析證明書 (CoA); IFRA 證書 / 聲明; 無; 安全資料表 (SDS/MSDS); 技術資料表 (TDS); 其他
ro-RO: Documentație de siguranță disponibilă: Declarație/Certificat de alergeni; Certificat de analiză (CoA); Certificat/Declarație IFRA; Fără; Fișă cu date de securitate (SDS/MSDS); Fișă tehnică (TDS); Altele
sv: Säkerhetsdokumentation tillgänglig: Allergenutlåtande/-deklaration; Analyscertifikat (CoA); IFRA-certifikat/-utlåtande; Inga; Säkerhetsdatablad (SDS/MSDS); Tekniskt datablad (TDS); Övrigt
zh-CN: 安全文件可用性: 过敏原声明/宣告; 分析证书（CoA）; IFRA 证书/声明; 无; 安全数据表（SDS/MSDS）; 技术数据表（TDS）; 其他
hu: Elérhető biztonsági dokumentáció: Allergén nyilatkozat; Elemzési tanúsítvány (CoA); IFRA tanúsítvány/nyilatkozat; Nincs; Biztonsági adatlap (SDS/MSDS); Műszaki adatlap (TDS); Egyéb
th: เอกสารด้านความปลอดภัยมีให้ดูได้: เอกสาร/คำแถลงเกี่ยวกับสารก่อภูมิแพ้; ใบรับรองผลการวิเคราะห์(CoA); ใบรับรอง/คำแถลงIFRA; ไม่มี; เอกสารข้อมูลความปลอดภัย(SDS/MSDS); เอกสารข้อมูลทางเทคนิค(TDS); อื่นๆ
fr: Documentation de sécurité disponible: Déclaration des allergènes; Certificat d’analyse (CoA); Certificat IFRA; Aucune; Fiche de données de sécurité (FDS); Fiche technique; Autre
ko: 안전 문서 제공 여부: 알레르기 유발 물질 성명서/선언서; 분석 증명서(CoA); IFRA 인증서/성명서; 없음; 물질안전보건자료(SDS/MSDS); 기술 자료(TDS); 기타
sk-SK: Dostupná bezpečnostná dokumentácia: Vyhlásenie/deklarácia o alergénoch; Analytický certifikát (CoA); Certifikát/vyhlásenie IFRA; Žiadne; Karta bezpečnostných údajov (SDS/MSDS); Technický list (TDS); Iné